Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8415.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-19.18 of the General Laws entitled "Plastic Waste Reduction Act"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-19.18-7. Prohibition on black plastic takeout containers.
(a) As used herein, the term "black plastic takeout containers" means and refers to
containers made from recycled polypropylene or mineral-filled polypropylene, and which are used
for and to take out prepared foods or beverages from a restaurant, store, or other retail sales
establishment.
(b) On and after October 1, 2026, restaurants, stores, and other retail sales establishments
are prohibited from making any black plastic takeout containers available to customers for use to
take out food or beverages from the establishment or restaurant. Restaurants, stores, and other retail
sales establishments that make deliveries of goods from its premises to customers are prohibited
from delivering food to customers in black plastic takeout containers
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on October 1, 2026.
========
LC006277
========